src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 68 front
!!€  isännöidä: isännöidä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # host
0:id  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:id  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:itse  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0+Use/NG:i  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0+Use/NG:itse  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_3SG_I  ;
0:itse  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:its  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:its  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_MELLAKOIDA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 68 back
!!€  mellakoida: mellakoida+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # riot
0:id  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:id  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0+Use/NG:itse  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0+Use/NG:itse  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_BACK_3SG_I  ;
0:itse  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:its  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:its  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_D  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!!  In these stems the tse formed stem is only one.

LEXICON VERB_PALKITA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 69 back
!!€  palkita: palkita+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # reward
0:t  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tse  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tse  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tse  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:ts  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ts  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ts  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:n  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tse  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_MERKITÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 69 front
!!€  merkitä: merkitä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # mark
0:t  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tse  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tse  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tse  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:ts  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ts  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ts  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:n  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tse  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!!  Few words have special consonant cluster simplification for ks forms.

LEXICON VERB_JUOSTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 70 back
!!€  juosta: juosta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # run
0:st  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:st  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kse  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kse  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kse  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:ks  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ks  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ks  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_STRONG  ;
0:kse  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_PIESTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 70 front
!!€  piestä: piestä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # spank
0:st  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:st  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kse  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kse  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kse  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:ks  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ks  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ks  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kse  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
:s  VERB_FRONT_OPTATIVE_S_ARCHAIC  ;


!!  nähdä has special h:k variation.

LEXICON VERB_NÄHDÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 71
!!€  nähdä: nähdä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # see
0:hd  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:hd  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ke  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ke  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:k  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:k  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:h  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:h  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:h  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:h  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:h  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;
0:ke  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!! ### Verbs with -ne- stems

LEXICON VERB_KARHETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 back
!!€  karheta: karheta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:t  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ne  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ne  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ne  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:n  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:n  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:n  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:n  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ne  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_VÄHETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 rfont
!!€  vähetä: vähetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # lessen
0:t  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ne  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ne  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ne  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:n  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:n  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:n  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:n  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ne  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_NIUKETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 back 0~k
!!€  niuketa: niuketa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # tighten
0:et  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kene  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kene  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kene  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:ken  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ken  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ken  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:en  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kene  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_JYRKETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 front 0~k
!!€  jyrketä: jyrketä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:et  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kene  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kene  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kene  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:ken  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ken  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ken  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:en  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kene  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_HAPATA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 back 0~p
!!€  hapata: hapata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # ensour
0:at  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pane  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pane  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pane  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:pan  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pan  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pan  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:an  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pane  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SUPETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 front 0~p
!!€  supeta: supeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # tighten
0:et  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pene  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pene  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pene  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:pen  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pen  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pen  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:en  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pene  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_TYLPETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 72 front 0~p
!!€  tylpetä: tylpetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # dull
0:et  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:pene  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pene  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pene  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:pen  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pen  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pen  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:en  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pene  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
