src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
aprikoida+V:apriko  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
haaleta+V:haale  VERB_KARHETA  ;
hallita+V:halli  VERB_PALKITA  ;
hapata+V:hap  VERB_HAPATA  ;
haravoida+V:haravo  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
harveta+V:harve  VERB_KARHETA  ;
havaita+V:havai  VERB_PALKITA  ;
heiketä+V:heik  VERB_JYRKETÄ  ;
heilimöidä+V:heilimö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
hekumoida+V:hekumo  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
herketä+V:herk  VERB_JYRKETÄ  ;
hillitä+V:hilli  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
himmetä+V:himme  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
hoiketa+V:hoik  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
huipeta+V:huip  VERB_SUPETA  ;
huolita+V:huoli  VERB_PALKITA  ;
huonota+V:huono  VERB_KARHETA  ;
häiritä+V:häiri  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
hölletä+V:hölle  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
ikävöidä+V:ikävö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
ilakoida+V:ilako  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
imuroida+V:imuro  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
isännöidä+V:isännö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
juosta+V:juo  VERB_JUOSTA  ;
jylhetä+V:jylhe  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
jyrketä+V:jyrk  VERB_JYRKETÄ  ;
jäyketä+V:jäyk  VERB_JYRKETÄ  ;
kahlita+V:kahli  VERB_PALKITA  ;
kalkita+V:kalki  VERB_PALKITA  ;
kapinoida+V:kapino  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
kareta+V:kare  VERB_KARHETA  ;
kaulita+V:kauli  VERB_PALKITA  ;
keikaroida+V:keikaro  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
kekkuloida+V:kekkulo  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
kelmetä+V:kelme  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
keritä+V:keri  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
kestitä+V:kesti  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
kihelmöidä+V:kihelmö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
kipenöidä+V:kipenö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
kipinöidä+V:kipinö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
kiretä+V:kire  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
koheloida+V:kohelo  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
koheta+V:kohe  VERB_KARHETA  ;
korkita+V:korki  VERB_PALKITA  ;
korvamerkitä+V:korvamerki  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
kummeta+V:kumme  VERB_KARHETA  ;
kuumasinkitä+V:kuumasinki  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
kuurnita+V:kuurni  VERB_PALKITA  ;
kuutioida+V:kuutio  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
kyetä+V:ky  VERB_JYRKETÄ  ;
kypsetä+V:kypse  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
kyyditä+V:kyydi  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
kyynelöidä+V:kyynelö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
käpälöidä+V:käpälö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
kärhämöidä+V:kärhämö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
käräjöidä+V:käräjö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
köyhetä+V:köyhe  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
laimeta+V:laime  VERB_KARHETA  ;
leikitä+V:leiki  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
lievetä+V:lieve  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
liietä+V:lii  VERB_JYRKETÄ  ;
liikennöidä+V:liikennö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
liueta+V:liu  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
luennoida+V:luenno  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
lukita+V:luki  VERB_PALKITA  ;
lähetä+V:lähe  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
lääkitä+V:lääki  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
mellakoida+V:mellako  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
merkitä+V:merki  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
metelöidä+V:metelö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
muistiinmerkitä+V:muistiinmerki  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
mureta+V:mure  VERB_KARHETA  ;
naulita+V:nauli  VERB_PALKITA  ;
niuketa+V:niuk  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
nuoreta+V:nuore  VERB_KARHETA  ;
nähdä+V:nä  VERB_NÄHDÄ  ;
oieta+V:oi  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
paeta+V:pa  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
pakinoida+V:pakino  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
paranee+V:paran  VERB_KARHETA  ;
parkita+V:parki  VERB_PALKITA  ;
pehmetä+V:pehme  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
piestä+V:pie  VERB_PIESTÄ  ;
pilvetä+V:pilve  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
pokkuroida+V:pokkuro  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
polttomerkitä+V:polttomerki  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
pullikoida+V:pulliko  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
pyöretä+V:pyöre  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
ranketa+V:rank  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
raueta+V:rau  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
ravita+V:ravi  VERB_PALKITA  ;
rettelöidä+V:rettelö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
rähinöidä+V:rähinö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
saeta+V:sa  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
sanketa+V:sank  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
seppelöidä+V:seppelö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
sietä+V:si  VERB_JYRKETÄ  ;
sisetä+V:sise  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
soeta+V:so  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
soieta+V:soi  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
someta+V:some  VERB_KARHETA  ;
souketa+V:souk  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
suipeta+V:suip  VERB_SUPETA  ;
supeta+V:sup  VERB_SUPETA  ;
suudita+V:suudi  VERB_PALKITA  ;
suureta+V:suure  VERB_KARHETA  ;
synketä+V:synk  VERB_JYRKETÄ  ;
syöstä+V:syö  VERB_PIESTÄ  ;
sähkösinkitä+V:sähkösinki  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
taeta+V:ta  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
tarita+V:tari  VERB_PALKITA  ;
tehdä+V:te  VERB_NÄHDÄ  ;
teikaroida+V:teikaro  VERB_MELLAKOIDA  ;
tietoliikennöidä+V:tietoliikennö  VERB_ISÄNNÖIDÄ  ;
toeta+V:to  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
tuhmeta+V:tuhme  VERB_KARHETA  ;
tuomita+V:tuomi  VERB_PALKITA  ;
turvamerkitä+V:turvamerki  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
tyhjetä+V:tyhje  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
tylpetä+V:tylp  VERB_TYLPETÄ  ;
ulkonee+V:ulkon  VERB_KARHETA  ;
vajeta+V:vaje  VERB_KARHETA  ;
vangita+V:vangi  VERB_PALKITA  ;
vanketa+V:vank  VERB_NIUKETA  ;
viiletä+V:viile  VERB_VÄHETÄ  ;
ylimerkitä+V:ylimerki  VERB_MERKITÄ  ;
